Washington statutes.
RCW 31.04.310

Residential mortgage or student education loan servicer—Appointment of receiver.

Upon application by the director and upon a showing that the interests of borrowers or creditors so requires, the superior court may appoint a receiver to take over, operate, or liquidate any residential mortgage or student education loan servicer.

The director's obligations or duties under chapter 62, Laws of 2018 are subject to section 21, chapter 62, Laws of 2018.

[ 2018 c 62 s 18; 2015 c 229 s 26.]